Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
Article 4 Sale of Payment Instruments
7-1-697.
No limitation on common law liability or state prosecution.

Nothing in this article shall limit any statutory or common law right of any person to bring any action in any court for any act involved in the transmission of money or selling of payment instruments or the right of the state to punish any person for any violation of any law.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-697

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 251, § 1/HB 982; Ga. L. 2015, p. 344, § 28/HB 184.

7-1-698.
Continuing effectiveness of existing licenses.

Every license in force and effect under the former provisions of this article, relating to sale of checks and money orders, on July 1, 2014, shall remain in full force and effect on July 1, 2014, and all such existing licensees shall be required to renew their licenses pursuant to Code Section 7-1-685.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-698

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 251, § 1/HB 982; Ga. L. 2015, p. 5, § 7/HB 90.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2014, “July 1, 2014” was substituted for “the date of enactment of this article” and “July 1, 2014” was substituted for “the effective date of this article” in this Code section.